dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="ek/er__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>rar</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rarna</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ern</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="apropå__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="scenari/o__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ot</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>on</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ona</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lås__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tad/el__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>let</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="u__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/ås__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>ässen</l><r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>äss</l><r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>åsen</l><r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ås</l><r>ås<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spaniel__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kids__n_pl">
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sek/el__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>let</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lerna</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>len</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ler</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="i-l/and__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>and</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>andet</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>änder</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>änderna</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="förm/an__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>ännen</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>an</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>annen</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>än</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sig/el__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>lerna</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eln</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ler</l><r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vin__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="skravel"><i>skrav</i><par n="tad/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="knickers"><i>knickers</i><par n="kids__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="lås"><i>lås</i><par n="lås__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="biståndsland"><i>biståndsl</i><par n="i-l/and__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tillsyningsman"><i>tillsyningsm</i><par n="förm/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kvartssekel"><i>kvartssek</i><par n="sek/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="u"><i>u</i><par n="u__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sädgås"><i>sädg</i><par n="g/ås__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="förmörkelsevariabel"><i>förmörkelsevariab</i><par n="sig/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="spaniel"><i>spaniel</i><par n="spaniel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kornåker"><i>kornåk</i><par n="ek/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gås"><i>g</i><par n="g/ås__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="apropå"><i>apropå</i><par n="apropå__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="cenakel"><i>cenak</i><par n="sek/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bermudashorts"><i>bermudashorts</i><par n="kids__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="toxafen"><i>toxafen</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="prutgås"><i>prutg</i><par n="g/ås__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="scenario"><i>scenari</i><par n="scenari/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kanadagås"><i>kanadag</i><par n="g/ås__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="matland"><i>matl</i><par n="i-l/and__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="finansminister"><i>finansminist</i><par n="ek/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="mögel"><i>mög</i><par n="tad/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="cockerspaniel"><i>cockerspaniel</i><par n="spaniel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="boots"><i>boots</i><par n="kids__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="upprorsman"><i>upprorsm</i><par n="förm/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="turordningsregel"><i>turordningsreg</i><par n="sig/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="frisbee"><i>frisbee</i><par n="spaniel__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fiffel"><i>fiff</i><par n="tad/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="jodhpurs"><i>jodhpurs</i><par n="kids__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="silversalt"><i>silversalt</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rolighetsminister"><i>rolighetsminist</i><par n="ek/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="besättningsman"><i>besättningsm</i><par n="förm/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sameland"><i>samel</i><par n="i-l/and__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="hångel"><i>hång</i><par n="tad/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ryggmuskel"><i>ryggmusk</i><par n="sig/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="mumsmums"><i>mumsmums</i><par n="lås__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="Medelhavsland"><i>Medelhavsl</i><par n="i-l/and__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dingeldangel"><i>dingeldang</i><par n="tad/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fosterförälder"><i>fosterföräld</i><par n="ek/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="plums"><i>plums</i><par n="lås__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="korpus"><i>korpus</i><par n="lås__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="corpus"><i>corpus</i><par n="lås__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="skiljeman"><i>skiljem</i><par n="förm/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="blodprotein"><i>blodprotein</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="pumps"><i>pumps</i><par n="kids__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="bläsgås"><i>bläsg</i><par n="g/ås__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="halvsekel"><i>halvsek</i><par n="sek/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="mardrömscenario"><i>mardrömscenari</i><par n="scenari/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skräckel"><i>skräck</i><par n="tad/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ordförandeland"><i>ordförandel</i><par n="i-l/and__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="trivselregel"><i>trivselreg</i><par n="sig/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="linåker"><i>linåk</i><par n="ek/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tabernakel"><i>tabernak</i><par n="sek/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="oljeland"><i>oljel</i><par n="i-l/and__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="porslin"><i>porslin</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sekel"><i>sek</i><par n="sek/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="mirakel"><i>mirak</i><par n="sek/el__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="toppman"><i>toppm</i><par n="förm/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gubbs"><i>gubbs</i><par n="kids__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="armmuskel"><i>armmusk</i><par n="sig/el__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fettlever"><i>fettlev</i><par n="ek/er__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="abstrakt"><i>abstrakt</i><par n="vin__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="grågås"><i>gråg</i><par n="g/ås__n_ut"/></e>
